inc/V-CLASS_UHL_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - ñáagwaalaa - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UHL_STEM_3

     ñáaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáagwaalaa
     ñáaguhl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: ñáagwaalaan
     ñáaguhl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñáagwaalaas
     ñáaguhl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñáagwaalaa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñáagwaal'ahlanggang
     ñáaguhl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: ñáagwaal'ahlanggan
     ñáaguhl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáagwaal'ahlanggiinii
     ñáaguhl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñáagwaal'ahlans
     ñáaguhl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñáagwaalaa'ahlang
     ñáaguhl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñáagwaalaa'ahlanggaa
     ñáaguhl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñáagwaalaa'ahlanggang
     ñáaguhl+V+REFLEXIVE: ñáagwaal'ahl
